Massachusetts, session 194th, S2495.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 115 of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
inserting after the definition of “Secretary” the following definition:-  
''Uniformed services'', shall have the same meaning as in 38 U.S.C. section 4303(16) and 
shall include: (i) the armed forces of the commonwealth, including the state defense force or 
similar organization composed as permitted by law; (ii) the state staff when engaged in duty 
under this chapter or Title 32 of the United States Code; or (iii) the armed forces of another state 
or territory when ordered to active duty under appropriate authority.  
SECTION 2.  Said chapter 115 is hereby further amended by inserting after section 2D 
the following section:-  

of 2 10  Section 2E. Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights 
(a) There shall be a veteran employment and reemployment rights division within the 
executive office of veterans services to assist veterans and service members with employment 
disputes. There shall be within the division: (i) intake officers to serve as the designated initial 
point of contact for veterans and service members within the division; (ii) investigators to 
conduct the division’s formal inquiries or investigations, as necessary; and (iii) mediators to act 
as an intermediary between veterans and service members and employers. 
(b) Under the direction of the secretary of the executive office of veterans services, the 
veteran employment and reemployment rights division shall: (i) employ intake officers to meet 
with veterans and service members, gather preliminary evidence and facts from the service 
member or veteran, and gather preliminary evidence on military service, employment, and 
reemployment; (ii) employ investigators to contact employers and military components for the 
purpose of gathering pertinent evidence; (iii) conclude whether there was improper conduct in 
violation of Sections 4301 to 4333, inclusive, of title 38 of the United States Code, the 
Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act or the General Laws; and (iv) 
employ mediators to contact the employer and veteran to offer mediation to resolve disputes and 
correct any improper conduct.   
(c) If mediation under this section is unsuccessful, the Executive Office of Veterans 
Services shall refer the case to the attorney general for further action.